District of Columbia statutes.
1-319.04

Inapplicability to offices of United States Marshal or United States Attorney for the District of Columbia.

No provision of §§ 1-319.01 to 1-319.05 shall be deemed to apply to volunteers in the Offices of the United States Marshal or the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia.

June 28, 1977, D.C. Law 2-12, § 5, 24 DCR 1442
1981 Ed., § 1-307.
1973 Ed., § 1-215d.